Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.58
Depositions, bills of exceptions, and transcripts sold by court reporter; exemption.

Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, use, or other consumption in this state of depositions, bills of exceptions, and transcripts or copies of such depositions, bills of exceptions, and transcripts prepared and sold by a court reporter.

Laws 2008, LB916, § 22.